Mississippi, session 2026, SB2632.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Local Governments Disaster Recovery Emergency Loan Program Act." SECTION 2.  As used in this section, the following terms shall have the meaning ascribed herein unless the context clearly requires otherwise: (a) "Department" means the Department of Finance and Administration. (b) "Disaster" means the severe winter storm on January 23-27, 2026. (c)  "Eligible expenditures" means expenses of a local government that are reimbursable from the Federal Emergency Management Agency under the public assistance categories B through F for that local government within the federally declared disaster area.  For expenses of a local government under the public assistance category F, any expenditures for utility co-operatives shall only be incurred for government utility co-operatives.  The term does not include expenses incurred for losses that are otherwise covered as insured losses or covered by donations. (d)  "Emergency fund" means the "2026 Local Governments Disaster Recovery Emergency Loan Fund" created in Section 4 of this act. (e)  "Federal disaster declaration" means the presidential declaration providing assistance in response to the disaster. (f)  "Federally declared disaster area" means those counties designated in the federal disaster declaration or added to the federal disaster declaration by amendment of the Federal Emergency Management Agency. (g)  "Loan" means a disbursement of public funds to a principal or secondary borrower under this act that is required to be repaid to the emergency fund by the borrower in accordance with the terms of an executed loan agreement. (h)  "Local government" means a county or municipality within the bounds of the federally declared disaster area.                  (i)  "Principal borrower" means a recipient county within the bounds of the federally declared disaster area. (j) "Program" means the 2026 Local Government Disaster Recovery Emergency Loan Program established in Section 3 of this act. (k)  "Secondary borrower" means a recipient municipality within the bounds of the federally declared disaster area. (l)  "Secondary loan" means a loan to a secondary borrower that is supplemental to the principal borrower's loan. SECTION 3. (1)  (a)  There is established the 2026 Local Government Disaster Recovery Emergency Loan Program to be administered by the Department of Finance and Administration for the purpose of assisting local governments in recovering from the disaster by issuing loans to local governments. (b)  The department shall act as quickly as is practicable and prudent in deciding on any loan request that it receives.  Loans from the emergency fund may be made to eligible local governments, as set forth in an executed loan agreement in amounts not to exceed one hundred percent (100%) of the eligible expenditures of the local government as determined by the department.  The department may establish a maximum amount for any loan from the emergency fund in order to provide for broad and equitable participation in the program.  Disbursement of loan proceeds shall not exceed any one county's pro rata share of the overall disaster assessments as determined by the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency at the time of the effective date of this act or at the time of the first assessment by the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency for any counties added to the federally declared disaster area. (c)  Eligible principal borrowers may apply to the department for a loan.  Eligible secondary borrowers may receive secondary loans from the department. (d)  No loan shall be issued under this act after July 1, 2027.  The term of any loan issued under this act shall not exceed a period of five (5) years. (2)  (a)  Loan proceeds may be used by the recipient local government for eligible expenditures. (b)  The interest rate on the loans may vary from time to time and from loan to loan, and shall be at or below market interest rates as determined by the department, but the interest rate shall be fixed at a rate sufficient to cover the administrative costs to issue and service the loan. (3)  In administering this act, the department shall have the following powers and duties: (a)  To supervise the use of all funds and loan proceeds made available under this act for local governments to recover from the disaster; (b)  To promulgate rules and regulations, to make variances and exceptions thereto, and to establish procedures in accordance with this act for the implementation of the program; (c)  To ensure that the funds made available under this act to a local government provide for a distribution of funds that ensures broad and equitable participation among the local governments effected by the disaster; (d)  To maintain in accordance with generally accepted government accounting standards an accurate record of all monies in the emergency fund made available to local governments under this act and the expenditures incurred by each recipient; (e)  To establish policies, procedures and requirements concerning viability and financial capability to repay loans that may be used in approving loans available under this section, including a requirement that all loan recipients have a rate structure which will be sufficient to cover the costs of issuing and servicing the loan made under this act; (f)  To use amounts available to it from the emergency fund to contract for those facilities and staff needed to administer and provide routine management for the funds and loan program; (g)  To require recipient local governments to consult with the county's emergency management agency and/or the area director of the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency; (h)  To ensure that the pledged revenue as collateral by a principal borrower or secondary borrower is sufficient to repay the loan within the loan period; (i)  Require a rigorous documentation process to ensure that state funds are utilized in a manner that maximizes eventual federal reimbursement; (j)  To file annually with the Legislature a report, no later than November 1 of each year, detailing how monies in the emergency fund were expended during the preceding year by each participating local government by period, the number of loans approved and disbursed, the amount of expenditures incurred by each loan recipient, the current balance of any outstanding loans, the specific projects of each loan recipient with a description of the project and the recipient entities, the amounts deposited into the emergency fund under Section 5(4) by loan, and the number of loans repaid under this act. (4)  For efficient and effective administration of the program and emergency fund, the department may authorize an administrator to carry out any or all of the powers and duties enumerated above. (5)  In carrying out its responsibilities under this act, for any contract under the purview of the Public Procurement Review Board, the department shall be exempt from any requirement that the Public Procurement Review Board approve any personal or professional services contracts or pre-approve any solicitation of such contracts. SECTION 4. (1)  There is created a special fund in the State Treasury to be designated as the "2026 Local Governments Disaster Recovery Emergency Loan Fund." The emergency fund shall consist of any monies deposited to the credit of the emergency fund.  The emergency fund may receive deposits by the State Treasurer, bond proceeds, grants, gifts, donations or funds from any source, public or private.  Except as otherwise provided in this section, the emergency fund shall be credited with all repayments of principal and interest derived from loans made from the emergency fund.  Unexpended amounts remaining in the emergency fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund.  Any interest earned on amounts in the emergency fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund. (2)  The monies in the emergency fund may only be expended subject to appropriation by the Legislature.  Monies in the emergency fund may only be disbursed for purposes authorized under this act.  Except as otherwise provided in this act, all monies deposited in the emergency fund, including loan repayments and interest earned on those repayments, shall be used only for providing loans to local governments as the department deems appropriate.  Subject to the availability of funds and the disbursement limit provided in Section 3(1)(e) of this act, loan proceeds under this act may be disbursed to local governments in one or more installments or on a rolling basis, in the discretion of the department. (3)  In addition to any other purpose authorized under this act, subject to appropriation by the Legislature, any amounts in the emergency fund may be used to defray the reasonable costs of administering the emergency fund and conducting activities under this act in an amount not to exceed three percent (3%) of the monies disbursed from the fund. SECTION 5. (1)  (a)  Each recipient of a loan under the program shall establish a dedicated source of revenue for repayment of the loan in the event that the Federal Emergency Management Agency disallows a reimbursement request for an expenditure for which loan proceeds were used.  Before any local government shall receive any loan, it shall have executed with the Department of Revenue and the department a loan agreement evidencing that loan.  This requirement shall apply to any principal borrower and secondary borrower. (b)  The executed loan agreement will obligate the local government to repay the proceeds of the loan to the department immediately upon receipt of any reimbursements from the Federal Emergency Management Agency. (c)  In the event that the Federal Emergency Management Agency disallows a reimbursement request for an expenditure for which loan proceeds were used, the repayment schedule in each loan agreement shall provide for (i) monthly payments, (ii) semiannual payments, or (iii) other periodic payments.  The loan agreement shall provide for the repayment of all funds received from the emergency fund to the department within not more than two (2) years from the date that the Federal Emergency Management Agency disallowed a reimbursement request for an expenditure for which loan proceeds were used.  The Department of Revenue shall withhold semiannually from counties and monthly from municipalities from the amount to be remitted to the county or municipality, a sum equal to the next repayment as provided in the loan agreement in the event that the Federal Emergency Management Agency disallows a reimbursement request for an expenditure for which loan proceeds were used and the county or municipality has pledged such revenue. (2)  A principal borrower that receives a loan from the emergency fund shall pledge for repayment of the loan any part of the use tax to which it may be entitled under Chapter 67, Title 27, Mississippi Code of 1972, or any other revenue source to which it is entitled by law, as may be required to meet the repayment schedule contained in the loan agreement in the event that the Federal Emergency Management Agency disallows a reimbursement request for an expenditure for which loan proceeds were used. (3)  A secondary borrower that receives a secondary loan from the emergency fund shall pledge for repayment of the loan any part of the sales tax revenue distribution to which it may be entitled under Section 27-65-75 or any other revenue source to which it is entitled by law, as may be required to meet the repayment schedule contained in the loan agreement in the event that the Federal Emergency Management Agency disallows a reimbursement request for an expenditure for which loan proceeds were used. (4)  Upon receipt of any funds in repayment from the principal borrower, secondary borrower, or the Department of Revenue to the credit of a borrower for loan obligations under this act, the department shall immediately deposit such funds into the emergency fund. (5)  The State Auditor, upon request of the department, shall audit the receipts and expenditures of a local government whose loan repayments appear to be in arrears, and if the Auditor finds that the local government is in arrears in those repayments, the Auditor shall immediately notify the State Fiscal Officer who may take any action as may be necessary to enforce the terms of the loan agreement, including liquidation and enforcement of the security given for repayment of the loan and the withholding of all future payments to the county of homestead exemption annual tax loss reimbursements under Section 27-33-77 and all sums allocated to the county or the municipality under Section 27-65-75 until such time as the county or the municipality is again current in its loan repayments as certified by the department. SECTION 6. Section 27-104-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-104-7.  (1)  (a) There is created the Public Procurement Review Board, which shall be reconstituted on January 1, 2018, and shall be composed of the following members: (i)  Three (3) individuals appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate; (ii)  Two (2) individuals appointed by the Lieutenant Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate; and (iii)  The Executive Director of the Department of Finance and Administration, serving as an ex officio and nonvoting member. (b)  The initial terms of each appointee shall be as follows: (i)  One (1) member appointed by the Governor to serve for a term ending on June 30, 2019; (ii)  One (1) member appointed by the Governor to serve for a term ending on June 30, 2020; (iii)  One (1) member appointed by the Governor to serve for a term ending on June 30, 2021; (iv)  One (1) member appointed by the Lieutenant Governor to serve for a term ending on June 30, 2019; and (v)  One (1) member appointed by the Lieutenant Governor to serve for a term ending on June 30, 2020. After the expiration of the initial terms, all appointed members' terms shall be for a period of four (4) years from the expiration date of the previous term, and until such time as the member's successor is duly appointed and qualified. (c)  When appointing members to the Public Procurement Review Board, the Governor and Lieutenant Governor shall take into consideration persons who possess at least five (5) years of management experience in general business, health care or finance for an organization, corporation or other public or private entity.  Any person, or any employee or owner of a company, who receives any grants, procurements or contracts that are subject to approval under this section shall not be appointed to the Public Procurement Review Board.  Any person, or any employee or owner of a company, who is a principal of the source providing a personal or professional service shall not be appointed to the Public Procurement Review Board if the principal owns or controls a greater than five percent (5%) interest or has an ownership value of One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) in the source's business, whichever is smaller.  No member shall be an officer or employee of the State of Mississippi while serving as a voting member on the Public Procurement Review Board. (d)  Members of the Public Procurement Review Board shall be entitled to per diem as authorized by Section 25-3-69 and travel reimbursement as authorized by Section 25-3-41. (e)  The members of the Public Procurement Review Board shall elect a chair from among the membership, and he or she shall preside over the meetings of the board.  The board shall annually elect a vice chair, who shall serve in the absence of the chair.  No business shall be transacted, including adoption of rules of procedure, without the presence of a quorum of the board.  Three (3) members shall be a quorum. No action shall be valid unless approved by a majority of the members present and voting, entered upon the minutes of the board and signed by the chair. Necessary clerical and administrative support for the board shall be provided by the Department of Finance and Administration.  Minutes shall be kept of the proceedings of each meeting, copies of which shall be filed on a monthly basis with the chairs of the Accountability, Efficiency and Transparency Committees of the Senate and House of Representatives and the chairs of the Appropriations Committees of the Senate and House of Representatives. (2)  The Public Procurement Review Board shall have the following powers and responsibilities: (a)  Approve all purchasing regulations governing the purchase or lease by any agency, as defined in Section 31-7-1, of commodities and equipment, except computer equipment acquired pursuant to Sections 25-53-1 through 25-53-29; (b)  Adopt regulations governing the approval of contracts let for the construction and maintenance of state buildings and other state facilities as well as related contracts for architectural and engineering services. The provisions of this paragraph (b) shall not apply to such contracts involving buildings and other facilities of state institutions of higher learning which are self-administered as provided under this paragraph (b) or Section 37-101-15(m); (c)  Adopt regulations governing any lease or rental agreement by any state agency or department, including any state agency financed entirely by federal funds, for space outside the buildings under the jurisdiction of the Department of Finance and Administration.  These regulations shall require each agency requesting to lease such space to provide the following information that shall be published by the Department of Finance and Administration on its website:  the agency to lease the space; the terms of the lease; the approximate square feet to be leased; the use for the space; a description of a suitable space; the general location desired for the leased space; the contact information for a person from the agency; the deadline date for the agency to have received a lease proposal; any other specific terms or conditions of the agency; and any other information deemed appropriate by the Division of Real Property Management of the Department of Finance and Administration or the Public Procurement Review Board.  The information shall be provided sufficiently in advance of the time the space is needed to allow the Division of Real Property Management of the Department of Finance and Administration to review and preapprove the lease before the time for advertisement begins; (d)  Adopt, in its discretion, regulations to set aside at least five percent (5%) of anticipated annual expenditures for the purchase of commodities from minority businesses; however, all such set-aside purchases shall comply with all purchasing regulations promulgated by the department and shall be subject to all bid requirements.  Set-aside purchases for which competitive bids are required shall be made from the lowest and best minority business bidder; however, if no minority bid is available or if the minority bid is more than two percent (2%) higher than the lowest bid, then bids shall be accepted and awarded to the lowest and best bidder.  However, the provisions in this paragraph shall not be construed to prohibit the rejection of a bid when only one (1) bid is received.  Such rejection shall be placed in the minutes.  For the purposes of this paragraph, the term "minority business" means a business which is owned by a person who is a citizen or lawful permanent resident of the United States and who is: (i)  Black:  having origins in any of the black racial groups of Africa; (ii)  Hispanic:  of Mexican, Puerto Rican, Cuban, Central or South American, or other Spanish or Portuguese culture or origin regardless of race; (iii)  Asian-American: having origins in any of the original people of the Far East, Southeast Asia, the Indian subcontinent, or the Pacific Islands; (iv)  American Indian or Alaskan Native:  having origins in any of the original people of North America; or (v)  Female; (e)  In consultation with and approval by the Chairs of the Senate and House Public Property Committees, approve leases, for a term not to exceed eighteen (18) months, entered into by state agencies for the purpose of providing parking arrangements for state employees who work in the Woolfolk Building, the Carroll Gartin Justice Building or the Walter Sillers Office Building; (f)  (i)  Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, promulgate rules and regulations governing the solicitation and selection of contractual services personnel, including personal and professional services contracts for any form of consulting, policy analysis, public relations, marketing, public affairs, legislative advocacy services or any other contract that the board deems appropriate for oversight, with the exception of: 1.  Any personal service contracts entered into by any agency that employs only nonstate service employees as defined in Section 25-9-107(c); 2.  Any personal service contracts entered into for computer or information technology-related services governed by the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services; 3.  Any personal service contracts entered into by the individual state institutions of higher learning; 4.  Any personal service contracts entered into by the Mississippi Department of Transportation; 5.  Any personal service contracts entered into by the Department of Human Services through June 30, 2019, which the Executive Director of the Department of Human Services determines would be useful in establishing and operating the Department of Child Protection Services; 6.  Any personal service contracts entered into by the Department of Child Protection Services through June 30, 2019; 7.  Any contracts for entertainers and/or performers at the Mississippi State Fairgrounds entered into by the Mississippi Fair Commission; 8.  Any contracts entered into by the Department of Finance and Administration when procuring aircraft maintenance, parts, equipment and/or services; 9.  Any contract entered into by the Department of Public Safety for service on specialized equipment and/or software required for the operation of such specialized equipment for use by the Office of Forensics Laboratories; 10.  Any personal or professional service contract entered into by the Mississippi Department of Health or the Department of Revenue solely in connection with their respective responsibilities under the Mississippi Medical Cannabis Act from February 2, 2022, through June 30, 2026; 11.  Any contract for attorney, accountant, actuary auditor, architect, engineer, anatomical pathologist, or utility rate expert services; 12.  Any personal service contracts approved by the Executive Director of the Department of Finance and Administration and entered into by the Coordinator of Mental Health Accessibility through June 30, 2022; 13.  Any personal or professional services contract entered into by the State Department of Health in carrying out its responsibilities under the ARPA Rural Water Associations Infrastructure Grant Program through June 30, 2026; 14.  And any personal or professional services contract entered into by the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality in carrying out its responsibilities under the Mississippi Municipality and County Water Infrastructure Grant Program Act of 2022, through June 30, 2026; 15.  Any personal or professional services contract entered into by an agency for the design, operation or maintenance of museum exhibits.  An agency making a purchase under this exemption shall publicly advertise a Request for Qualifications but shall be otherwise exempt.  Any contracts arising from the use of this exemption must be approved by the Public Procurement Review Board prior to execution by the agency; 16.  Any personal or professional services contract entered into by the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality in carrying out its responsibilities under Section 49-2-13(l).  This item 16 shall stand repealed on July 1, 2028; * * * and 17.  Any contract entered into by the State Department of Health for service on specialized equipment and/or software required for the operation of such specialized equipment for the use by the Public Health Laboratory * * *.; and 18.  Any contract entered into by the Department of Finance and Administration for personal or professional services under Section 3(5) of this act. Any such rules and regulations shall provide for maintaining continuous internal audit covering the activities of such agency affecting its revenue and expenditures as required under Section 7-7-3(6)(d).  Any rules and regulation changes related to personal and professional services contracts that the Public Procurement Review Board may propose shall be submitted to the Chairs of the Accountability, Efficiency and Transparency Committees of the Senate and House of Representatives and the Chairs of the Appropriation Committees of the Senate and House of Representatives at least fifteen (15) days before the board votes on the proposed changes, and those rules and regulation changes, if adopted, shall be promulgated in accordance with the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Act. (ii)  From and after July 1, 2024, the Public Procurement Review Board shall promulgate rules and regulations that require the Department of Finance and Administration to conduct personal and professional services solicitations as provided in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph for those services in excess of Seventy-five Thousand Dollars ($75,000.00) for the Department of Marine Resources, the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks, the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency and the Mississippi Development Authority, with assistance to be provided from these entities.  Any powers that have been conferred upon agencies in order to comply with the provisions of this section for personal and professional services solicitations shall be conferred upon the Department of Finance and Administration to conduct personal and professional services solicitations for the Department of Marine Resources, the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks, the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency and the Mississippi Development Authority for those services in excess of Seventy-five Thousand Dollars ($75,000.00).  The Department of Finance and Administration shall make any submissions that are required to be made by other agencies to the Public Procurement Review Board for the Department of Marine Resources, the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks, the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency and the Mississippi Development Authority. The provisions of this subparagraph (ii) shall stand repealed on June 30, 2027; (g)  Approve all personal and professional services contracts involving the expenditures of funds in excess of Seventy-five Thousand Dollars ($75,000.00), except as provided in paragraph (f) of this subsection (2) and in subsection (8); (h)  Develop mandatory standards with respect to contractual services personnel that require invitations for public bid, requests for proposals, record keeping and financial responsibility of contractors.  The Public Procurement Review Board shall, unless exempted under this paragraph (h) or under paragraph (i) or (o) of this subsection (2), require the agency involved to submit the procurement to a competitive procurement process, and may reserve the right to reject any or all resulting procurements; (i)  Prescribe certain circumstances by which agency heads may enter into contracts for personal and professional services without receiving prior approval from the Public Procurement Review Board.  The Public Procurement Review Board may establish a preapproved list of providers of various personal and professional services for set prices with which state agencies may contract without bidding or prior approval from the board; (i)  Agency requirements may be fulfilled by procuring services performed incident to the state's own programs.  The agency head shall determine in writing whether the price represents a fair market value for the services.  When the procurements are made from other governmental entities, the private sector need not be solicited; however, these contracts shall still be submitted for approval to the Public Procurement Review Board * * *.; (ii)  Contracts between two (2) state agencies, both under Public Procurement Review Board purview, shall not require Public Procurement Review Board approval.  However, the contracts shall still be entered into the enterprise resource planning system; (j)  Provide standards for the issuance of requests for proposals, the evaluation of proposals received, consideration of costs and quality of services proposed, contract negotiations, the administrative monitoring of contract performance by the agency and successful steps in terminating a contract; (k)  Present recommendations for governmental privatization and to evaluate privatization proposals submitted by any state agency; (l)  Authorize personal and professional service contracts to be effective for more than one (1) year provided a funding condition is included in any such multiple year contract, except the State Board of Education, which shall have the authority to enter into contractual agreements for student assessment for a period up to ten (10) years.  The State Board of Education shall procure these services in accordance with the Public Procurement Review Board procurement regulations; (m)  Request the State Auditor to conduct a performance audit on any personal or professional service contract; (n)  Prepare an annual report to the Legislature concerning the issuance of personal and professional services contracts during the previous year, collecting any necessary information from state agencies in making such report; (o)  Develop and implement the following standards and procedures for the approval of any sole source contract for personal and professional services regardless of the value of the procurement: (i)  For the purposes of this paragraph (o), the term "sole source" means only one (1) source is available that can provide the required personal or professional service. (ii)  An agency that has been issued a binding, valid court order mandating that a particular source or provider must be used for the required service must include a copy of the applicable court order in all future sole source contract reviews for the particular personal or professional service referenced in the court order. (iii)  Any agency alleging to have a sole source for any personal or professional service, other than those exempted under paragraph (f) of this subsection (2) and subsection (8), shall publish on the procurement portal website established by Sections 25-53-151 and 27-104-165, for at least fourteen (14) days, the terms of the proposed contract for those services.  In addition, the publication shall include, but is not limited to, the following information: 1.  The personal or professional service offered in the contract; 2.  An explanation of why the personal or professional service is the only one that can meet the needs of the agency; 3.  An explanation of why the source is the only person or entity that can provide the required personal or professional service; 4.  An explanation of why the amount to be expended for the personal or professional service is reasonable; and 5.  The efforts that the agency went through to obtain the best possible price for the personal or professional service. (iv)  If any person or entity objects and proposes that the personal or professional service published under subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph (o) is not a sole source service and can be provided by another person or entity, then the objecting person or entity shall notify the Public Procurement Review Board and the agency that published the proposed sole source contract with a detailed explanation of why the personal or professional service is not a sole source service. (v)  1.  If the agency determines after review that the personal or professional service in the proposed sole source contract can be provided by another person or entity, then the agency must withdraw the sole source contract publication from the procurement portal website and submit the procurement of the personal or professional service to an advertised competitive bid or selection process. 2.  If the agency determines after review that there is only one (1) source for the required personal or professional service, then the agency may appeal to the Public Procurement Review Board.  The agency has the burden of proving that the personal or professional service is only provided by one (1) source. 3.  If the Public Procurement Review Board has any reasonable doubt as to whether the personal or professional service can only be provided by one (1) source, then the agency must submit the procurement of the personal or professional service to an advertised competitive bid or selection process.  No action taken by the Public Procurement Review Board in this appeal process shall be valid unless approved by a majority of the members of the Public Procurement Review Board present and voting. (vi)  The Public Procurement Review Board shall prepare and submit a quarterly report to the House of Representatives and Senate Accountability, Efficiency and Transparency Committees that details the sole source contracts presented to the Public Procurement Review Board and the reasons that the Public Procurement Review Board approved or rejected each contract.  These quarterly reports shall also include the documentation and memoranda required in subsection (4) of this section.  An agency that submitted a sole source contract shall be prepared to explain the sole source contract to each committee by December 15 of each year upon request by the committee; (p)  Assess any fines and administrative penalties provided for in Sections 31-7-401 through 31-7-423. (3)  All submissions shall be made sufficiently in advance of each monthly meeting of the Public Procurement Review Board as prescribed by the Public Procurement Review Board. If the Public Procurement Review Board rejects any contract submitted for review or approval, the Public Procurement Review Board shall clearly set out the reasons for its action, including, but not limited to, the policy that the agency has violated in its submitted contract and any corrective actions that the agency may take to amend the contract to comply with the rules and regulations of the Public Procurement Review Board. (4)  All sole source contracts for personal and professional services awarded by state agencies, other than those exempted under Section 27-104-7(2)(f) and (8), whether approved by an agency head or the Public Procurement Review Board, shall contain in the procurement file a written determination for the approval, using a request form furnished by the Public Procurement Review Board.  The written determination shall document the basis for the determination, including any market analysis conducted in order to ensure that the service required was practicably available from only one (1) source.  A memorandum shall accompany the request form and address the following four (4) points: (a)  Explanation of why this service is the only service that can meet the needs of the purchasing agency; (b)  Explanation of why this vendor is the only practicably available source from which to obtain this service; (c)  Explanation of why the price is considered reasonable; and (d)  Description of the efforts that were made to conduct a noncompetitive negotiation to get the best possible price for the taxpayers. (5)  In conjunction with the State Personnel Board, the Public Procurement Review Board shall develop and promulgate rules and regulations to define the allowable legal relationship between contract employees and the contracting departments, agencies and institutions of state government under the jurisdiction of the State Personnel Board, in compliance with the applicable rules and regulations of the federal Internal Revenue Service (IRS) for federal employment tax purposes.  Under these regulations, the usual common law rules are applicable to determine and require that such worker is an independent contractor and not an employee, requiring evidence of lawful behavioral control, lawful financial control and lawful relationship of the parties.  Any state department, agency or institution shall only be authorized to contract for personnel services in compliance with those regulations. (6)  No member of the Public Procurement Review Board shall use his or her official authority or influence to coerce, by threat of discharge from employment, or otherwise, the purchase of commodities, the contracting for personal or professional services, or the contracting for public construction under this chapter. (7)  Notwithstanding any other laws or rules to the contrary, the provisions of subsection (2) of this section shall not be applicable to the Mississippi State Port Authority at Gulfport. (8)  Nothing in this section shall impair or limit the authority of the Board of Trustees of the Public Employees' Retirement System to enter into any personal or professional services contracts directly related to their constitutional obligation to manage the trust funds, including, but not limited to, actuarial, custodial banks, cash management, investment consultant and investment management contracts.  Nothing in this section shall impair or limit the authority of the State Treasurer to enter into any personal or professional services contracts involving the management of trust funds, including, but not limited to, actuarial, custodial banks, cash management, investment consultant and investment management contracts. (9)  Through December 31, 2026, the provisions of this section related to rental agreements or leasing of real property for the purpose of conducting agency business shall not apply to the Office of Workforce Development created in Section 37-153-7. SECTION 7. Section 33-15-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 33-15-1.  This article may be cited as the "Mississippi Emergency Management Law." SECTION 8. Section 33-15-2, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 33-15-2.  (1)  The Legislature finds and declares that the state is vulnerable to a wide range of emergencies, including natural, technological and man-made disasters, all of which threaten the life, health and safety of its people; damage and destroy property; disrupt services and everyday business and recreational activities; and impede economic growth and development.  The Legislature further finds that this vulnerability is exacerbated by the growth in the state's number of persons with special needs.  This growth has greatly complicated the state's ability to coordinate its emergency management resources and activities. (2)  It is the intent of the Legislature to reduce the vulnerability of the people and property of this state; to prepare for efficient evacuation and shelter of threatened or affected persons; to provide for the rapid and orderly provision of relief to persons and for the coordination of activities relating to emergency preparedness, response, recovery and mitigation among and between agencies and officials of this state, with similar agencies and officials of other states, with local and federal governments, with interstate organizations and with the private sector. (3)  It is further the intent of the Legislature to promote the state's emergency preparedness, response, recovery and mitigation capabilities through enhanced coordination, long-term planning and adequate funding.  State policy for responding to disasters is to support local emergency response efforts.  In the case of a major or catastrophic disaster, however, the needs of residents and communities will likely be greater than local resources.  In these situations, the state must be capable of providing effective, coordinated and timely support to communities and the public.  Therefore, the Legislature determines and declares that the provisions of this article fulfill an important state interest. SECTION 9. Section 33-15-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 33-15-3.  (a)  Because of the existing and increasing possibility of the occurrence of disasters or emergencies of unprecedented size and destructiveness resulting from enemy attack, sabotage or other hostile action, and from natural, man-made or technological disasters, and in order to insure that preparations of this state will be adequate to deal with, reduce vulnerability to, and recover from such disasters or emergencies, and generally to provide for the common defense and to protect the public peace, health and safety, and to preserve the lives and property of the people of this state, it is hereby found and declared necessary:  (1)  To create a state emergency management agency, and to authorize the creation of local organizations for emergency management in the municipalities and counties of the state, and to authorize cooperation with the federal government and the governments of other states; (2) to confer upon the Governor, the agency and upon the executive heads or governing bodies of the municipalities and counties of the state the emergency powers provided herein; (3) to provide for the rendering of mutual aid among the municipalities and counties of the state, and with other states, and with the federal government with respect to the carrying out of emergency management functions and responsibilities; (4) to authorize the establishment of such organizations and the development and employment of such measures as are necessary and appropriate to carry out the provisions of this article; and (5) to provide the means to assist in the prevention or mitigation of emergencies which may be caused or aggravated by inadequate planning for, and regulation of, public and private facilities and land use. (b)  It is further declared to be the purpose of this article and the policy of the state that all emergency management functions of this state be coordinated, to the maximum extent, with the comparable functions of the federal government, including its various departments and agencies, of other states and localities, and of private agencies of every type, to the end that the most effective preparation and use may be made of the nation's manpower, resources, and facilities for dealing with any disaster or emergency, or both, that may occur as enumerated in this section. SECTION 10. Section 33-15-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 33-15-5.  The following words, whenever used in this article shall, unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context, have the following meanings: (a)  "Agency" means the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency, created by Section 33-15-7. (b) "Director" means the Director of Emergency Management, appointed pursuant to Section 33-15-7. (c)  "Emergency management" means the preparation for, the mitigation of, the response to, and the recovery from emergencies and disasters.  Specific emergency management responsibilities include, but are not limited to: (i)  Reduction of vulnerability of people and communities of this state to damage, injury and loss of life and property resulting from natural, technological or man-made emergencies or hostile military paramilitary action. (ii)  Preparation for prompt and efficient response and recovery to protect lives and property affected by emergencies. (iii)  Response to emergencies using all systems, plans and resources necessary to preserve adequately the health, safety and welfare of persons or property affected by the emergency. (iv)  Recovery from emergencies by providing for the rapid and orderly start of restoration and rehabilitation of persons and property affected by emergencies. (v)  Provision of an emergency management system embodying all aspects of preemergency preparedness and postemergency response, recovery and mitigation. (vi)  Assistance in anticipation, recognition, appraisal, prevention and mitigation of emergencies which may be caused or aggravated by inadequate planning for, and regulation of public and private facilities and land use. (d)  "Civil defense," whenever it appears in the laws of the State of Mississippi, shall mean "emergency management" unless the context clearly indicates otherwise. (e)  "State of war emergency" means the condition which exists immediately, with or without a proclamation thereof by the Governor, whenever this state or nation is attacked by an enemy of the United States or upon receipt by the state of a warning from the federal government indicating that such an attack is probable or imminent. (f)  "State of emergency" means the duly proclaimed existence of conditions of disaster or extreme peril to the safety of persons or property within the state caused by air or water pollution, fire, flood, storm, epidemic, earthquake, hurricane, resource shortages, or other natural or man-made conditions other than conditions causing a "state of war emergency," which conditions by reasons of their magnitude are or are likely to be beyond the control of the services, personnel, equipment and facilities of any single county and/or municipality and requires combined forces of the state to combat. (g)  "Local emergency" means the duly proclaimed existence of conditions of disaster or extreme peril to the safety of persons and property within the territorial limits of a county and/or municipality caused by such conditions as air or water pollution, fire, flood, storm, epidemic, earthquake, hurricane, resource shortages or other natural or man-made conditions, which conditions are or are likely to be beyond the control of the services, personnel, equipment and facilities of the political subdivision and require the combined forces of other subdivisions or of the state to combat. (h) "Emergency" means any occurrence, or threat thereof, whether natural, technological, or man-made, in war or in peace, which results or may result in substantial injury or harm to the population or substantial damage to or loss of property. (i)  "Man-made emergency" means an emergency caused by an action against persons or society, including, but not limited to, emergency attack, sabotage, terrorism, civil unrest or other action impairing the orderly administration of government. (j)  "Natural emergency" means an emergency caused by a natural event, including, but not limited to, a hurricane, a storm, a flood, severe wave action, a drought or an earthquake. (k) "Technological emergency" means an emergency caused by a technological failure or accident, including, but not limited to, an explosion, transportation accident, radiological accident, or chemical or other hazardous material incident. (l)  "Local emergency management agency" means an organization created to discharge the emergency management responsibilities and functions of a political subdivision. (m) "Disaster" means any natural, technological or civil emergency as defined in this section that causes damage of sufficient severity and magnitude to result in a declaration of an emergency by a county or municipality, the Governor or the President of the United States.  Disasters shall be identified by the severity of resulting damage, as follows: (i) "Catastrophic disaster" means a disaster that will require massive state and federal assistance, including immediate military involvement. (ii)  "Major disaster" means a disaster that will likely exceed local capabilities and require a broad range of state and federal assistance. (iii)  "Minor disaster" means a disaster that is likely to be within the response capabilities of local government and to result in only a minimal need for state or federal assistance. (n)  "Disaster Reservist" means any person hired on a temporary basis pursuant to State Personnel Board policies and procedures regulating personal service contracts, that is hired to perform specific tasks related to a Governor's State of Emergency, or by an emergency or disaster declaration of the President of the United States, by the agency, and is assigned to perform such duties as may be required under the direction of the appropriate agency supervisor. (o)  "Emergency impact area" means the area of the state in which market conditions exist due to a state of emergency creating a likelihood that prices ordinarily charged for goods and services could be raised unfairly due to the underlying emergency. (p)  "Political subdivision" means a local government created by the State of Mississippi to assist in fulfilling the state's obligations.  The term "political subdivision" includes levee districts. SECTION 11. Section 33-15-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 33-15-7.  (a)  There is hereby created within the executive branch of the state government a department called the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency with a director of emergency management who shall be appointed by the Governor; he shall hold office during the pleasure of the Governor and shall be compensated as determined by any appropriation that may be made by the Legislature for such purposes. (b)  The director, with the approval of the Governor, may employ such technical, clerical, stenographic and other personnel, to be compensated as provided in any appropriation that may be made for such purpose, and may make such expenditures within the appropriation therefor, or from other funds made available to him for purposes of emergency management, as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this article. (c)  The director and other personnel of the emergency management agency shall be provided with appropriate office space, furniture, equipment, supplies, stationery and printing in the same manner as provided for other state agencies. (d)  The director, subject to the direction and control of the Governor, shall be the executive head of the emergency management agency and shall be responsible to the Governor for carrying out the program for emergency management of this state. He shall coordinate the activities of all organizations for emergency management within the state, and shall maintain liaison with and cooperate with emergency management agencies and organizations of other states and of the federal government, and shall have such additional authority, duties, and responsibilities authorized by this article as may be prescribed by the Governor. SECTION 12. Section 33-15-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 33-15-11.  (a)  The Governor shall have general direction and control of the activities of the Emergency Management Agency and Council and shall be responsible for the carrying out of the provisions of this article, and in the event of a man-made, technological or natural disaster or emergency beyond local control, may assume direct operational control over all or any part of the emergency management functions within this state. (b)  In performing his duties under this article, the Governor is further authorized and empowered: (1)  To make, amend and rescind the necessary orders, rules and regulations to carry out the provisions of this article with due consideration of the plans of the federal government, and to enter into disaster assistance grants and agreements with the federal government under the terms as may be required by federal law. (2)  To work with the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency in preparing a comprehensive plan and program for the emergency management of this state, such plan and program to be integrated into and coordinated with the emergency management plans of the federal government and of other states to the fullest possible extent, and to coordinate the preparation of plans and programs for emergency management by the political subdivisions of this state, such local plans to be integrated into and coordinated with the emergency management plan and program of this state to the fullest possible extent. (3)  In accordance with such plan and program for emergency management of this state, to ascertain the requirements of the state or the political subdivisions thereof for food or clothing or other necessities of life in the event of attack or natural or man-made or technological disasters and to plan for and procure supplies, medicines, materials and equipment, and to use and employ from time to time any of the property, services and resources within the state, for the purposes set forth in this article; to make surveys of the industries, resources and facilities within the state as are necessary to carry out the purposes of this article; to institute training programs and public information programs, and to take all other preparatory steps, including the partial or full mobilization of emergency management organizations in advance of actual disaster, to insure the furnishing of adequately trained and equipped forces of emergency management personnel in time of need. (4)  To cooperate with the President and the heads of the Armed Forces, and the Emergency Management Agency of the United States, and with the officers and agencies of other states in matters pertaining to the emergency management of the state and nation and the incidents thereof; and in connection therewith, to take any measures which he may deem proper to carry into effect any request of the President and the appropriate federal officers and agencies, for any action looking to emergency management, including the direction or control of (a) blackouts and practice blackouts, air raid drills, mobilization of emergency management forces, and other tests and exercises, (b) warnings and signals for drills or attacks and the mechanical devices to be used in connection therewith, (c) the effective screening or extinguishing of all lights and lighting devices and appliances, (d) shutting off water mains, gas mains, electric power connections and the suspension of all other utility services, (e) the conduct of civilians and the movement and cessation of movement of pedestrians and vehicular traffic during, prior and subsequent to drills or attack, (f) public meetings or gatherings under emergency conditions, and (g) the evacuation and reception of the civilian population. (5)  To take such action and give such directions to state and local law enforcement officers and agencies as may be reasonable and necessary for the purpose of securing compliance with the provisions of this article and with the orders, rules and regulations made pursuant thereto. (6)  To employ such measures and give such directions to the state or local boards of health as may be reasonably necessary for the purpose of securing compliance with the provisions of this article or with the findings or recommendations of such boards of health by reason of conditions arising from enemy attack or the threat of enemy attack or natural, man-made or technological disaster. (7)  To utilize the services and facilities of existing officers and agencies of the state and of the political subdivisions thereof; and all such officers and agencies shall cooperate with and extend their services and facilities to the Governor as he may request. (8)  To establish agencies and offices and to appoint executive, technical, clerical and other personnel as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this article including, with due consideration to the recommendation of the local authorities, part-time or full-time state and regional area directors. (9)  To delegate any authority vested in him under this article, and to provide for the subdelegation of any such authority. (10)  On behalf of this state to enter into reciprocal aid agreements or compacts with other states and the federal government, either on a statewide basis or local political subdivision basis or with a neighboring state or province of a foreign country.  Such mutual aid arrangements shall be limited to the furnishings or exchange of food, clothing, medicine and other supplies; engineering services; emergency housing; police services; national or state guards while under the control of the state; health, medical and related services; firefighting, rescue, transportation and construction services and equipment; personnel necessary to provide or conduct these services; and such other supplies, equipment, facilities, personnel and services as may be needed; the reimbursement of costs and expenses for equipment, supplies, personnel and similar items for mobile support units, firefighting and police units and health units; and on such terms and conditions as are deemed necessary. (11)  To sponsor and develop mutual aid plans and agreements between the political subdivisions of the state, similar to the mutual aid arrangements with other states referred to above. (12)  To collect information and data for assessment of vulnerabilities and capabilities within the borders of Mississippi as it pertains to the nation and state's security and homeland defense.  This information shall be exempt from the Mississippi Public Records Act, Section 25-61-1 et seq. (13)  Authorize any agency or arm of the state to create a special emergency management revolving fund, accept donations, contributions, fees, grants, including federal funds, as may be necessary for such agency or arm of the state to administer its functions of this article as set forth in the Executive Order of the Governor. (14)  To authorize the Commissioner of Public Safety to select, train, organize and equip a ready reserve of auxiliary highway patrolmen. (15)  To suspend or limit the sale, dispensing or transportation of alcoholic beverages, firearms, explosives and combustibles. (16)  To control, restrict and regulate by rationing, freezing, use of quotas, prohibitions on shipments, price-fixing, allocation or other means, the use, sale or distribution of food, feed, fuel, clothing and other commodities, materials, goods or services. (17)  To proclaim a state of emergency in an area affected or likely to be affected thereby when he finds that the conditions described in Section 33-15-5(g) exist, or when he is requested to do so by the mayor of a municipality or by the president of the board of supervisors of a county, or when he finds that a local authority is unable to cope with the emergency. Such proclamation shall be in writing and shall take effect immediately upon its execution by the Governor.  As soon thereafter as possible, such proclamation shall be filed with the Secretary of State and be given widespread notice and publicity.  The Governor, upon advice of the director, shall review the need for continuing the state of emergency at least every thirty (30) days until the emergency is terminated and shall proclaim a reduction of area or the termination of the state of emergency at the earliest possible date that conditions warrant. (18)  To declare an emergency impact area when he finds that the conditions described in Section 33-15-5(o) exist.  The proclamation shall be in writing and shall take effect immediately upon its execution by the Governor.  As soon as possible, the proclamation shall be filed with the Secretary of State and be given widespread notice and publicity.  The Governor shall review the need for continuing the declaration of emergency impact area at least every thirty (30) days until the emergency is terminated, and shall proclaim the reduction of the emergency impact area or termination of the declaration of emergency impact area at the earliest date or dates possible. (c)  In addition to the powers conferred upon the Governor in this section, the Legislature hereby expressly delegates to the Governor the following powers and duties in the event of an impending enemy attack, an enemy attack, or a man-made, technological or natural disaster where such disaster is beyond local control: (1)  To suspend the provisions of any regulatory statute prescribing the procedures for conduct of state business, or the orders, rules or regulations of any state agency, if strict compliance with the provisions of any statute, order, rule or regulation would in any way prevent, hinder or delay necessary action in coping with a disaster or emergency. (2)  To transfer the direction, personnel or functions of state agencies, boards, commissions or units thereof for the purpose of performing or facilitating disaster or emergency services. (3)  To commandeer or utilize any private property if necessary to cope with a disaster or emergency, provided that such private property so commandeered or utilized shall be paid for under terms and conditions agreed upon by the participating parties.  The owner of said property shall immediately be given a receipt for the said private property and said receipt shall serve as a valid claim against the Treasury of the State of Mississippi for the agreed upon market value of said property. (4)  To perform and exercise such other functions, powers and duties as may be necessary to promote and secure the safety and protection of the civilian population in coping with a disaster or emergency. (d)  This section does not authorize the Governor or a designee of the Governor to act in contravention of Section 33-7-303. SECTION 13. Section 33-15-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 33-15-13.  (a)  In the event of actual or impending enemy attack, as determined by the President, against the United States and the State of Mississippi, the Governor may proclaim that a state of war emergency exists, and thereafter the Governor shall have and may exercise for such period as such state of war emergency exists or continues, the following additional emergency powers: (1)  To enforce all laws, rules and regulations relating to emergency management and to assume direct operational control of all emergency management forces and helpers in the state; (2)  To purchase supplies and services for emergency management purposes, including aiding the populace, without necessity for advertising therefor; to call upon all persons, firms and corporations to furnish such supplies, services and facilities as they may control which may be needed for the protection of the public, and to enter into all necessary contracts and agreements as may be necessary with relation thereto, all or any provisions of law with reference to advertisements in such matters being expressly waived for this purpose; (3)  To utilize or commandeer any private property for the protection of the public or at the request of the President, the Armed Forces or the Emergency Management Agency of the United States including: (A)  For use during emergency only, all means of transportation and communication, except newspapers, or publications, or wire facilities leased or owned by news services, newspapers and other news publications; (B)  Food, clothing, equipment, materials, medicines, any supplies and stocks of fuel of whatever nature; (C)  Facilities including buildings and plants, for use during emergency only; in the event it shall become necessary to utilize any such facilities, plants or services, the operation thereof, if possible, shall be left in the hands of the owner, subject to direction of the Governor, and only such portion as may be essential for the protection of life and property, or the national defense, shall be commandeered or utilized; (4)  To sell, lend, give or distribute all or any such personal property utilized among the inhabitants of the state and to account to the State Treasurer for any funds received for such property; (5)  To perform and exercise such other functions, powers and duties as may be deemed necessary to promote and secure the safety and protection of the civilian population. (b)  Adequate compensation shall be paid for any property so utilized, taken or condemned.  In case it shall become necessary to take or use any private property as provided above, the full faith and credit of the State of Mississippi shall be pledged to pay just compensation therefor.  In case the Governor and the owner of any such property so utilized or taken shall not be able to agree on the compensation to be paid for use, damage or taking thereof, the amount of such compensation to be paid shall be determined in conformity with the statutes of this state relating to eminent domain procedures. (c)  All powers granted to the Governor by this section with respect to a state of war emergency shall terminate when the state of war emergency has been terminated by proclamation of the Governor or by concurrent resolution of the Legislature declaring it at an end. SECTION 14. Section 33-15-15, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 33-15-15.  (a)  The agency is authorized to provide, within or without the state, such support from available personnel, equipment and other resources of state agencies and the political subdivisions of the state as may be necessary to reinforce emergency management agencies in areas stricken by emergency.  Such support shall be rendered with due consideration of the plans of the federal government, this state, the other states and of the criticalness of the existing situation. Emergency management support forces shall be called to duty upon orders of the agency and shall perform their functions in any part of the state, or, upon the conditions specified in this section, in other states. (b)  Personnel of emergency management support forces while on duty, whether within or without the state, shall: (1)  If they are employees of the state, have the powers, duties, rights, privileges and immunities and receive the compensation incidental to their employment; (2)  If they are employees of a political subdivision of the state, and whether serving within or without such political subdivision, have the powers, duties, rights, privileges and immunities and receive the compensation incidental to their employment; and (3)  If they are not employees of the state or a political subdivision thereof, be entitled to compensation by the state at a rate commensurate with their duties and responsibilities and to the same rights and immunities as are provided by law for the employees of this state. All personnel of emergency management support forces shall, while on duty, be subject to the operational control of the authority in charge of emergency management activities in the area in which they are serving, and shall be reimbursed for all actual and necessary travel and subsistence expenses, and for death, disability or injury to such personnel while on such emergency duty as a member of an emergency management support force, the state shall pay compensation to the heirs in event of death or the individual in event of injury or disability in accordance with payment schedules contained in the Mississippi Workers' Compensation Law. (c)  The state shall reimburse a political subdivision for the actual and necessary travel, subsistence and maintenance expenses of employees of such political subdivision while serving as members of an emergency management support force, and for all payments for death, disability or injury of such employees incurred in the course of such duty, and for all losses of or damage to supplies and equipment of such political subdivision resulting from the operation of such emergency management support force.  The state may also reimburse a political subdivision for employees' overtime while deployed as members of an emergency management support force and backfill of deployed forces when determined by the director to be necessary to avoid serious financial consequences for the political subdivision providing support and when requested by the chief elected official of the political subdivision stating the circumstances for the request. (d)  Whenever an emergency management support force of another state shall render aid in this state pursuant to the orders of the governor of its home state and upon the request of the Governor of this state, the personnel thereof shall have the powers, duties, rights, privileges and immunities of emergency management personnel serving in similar capacities in this state, except compensation, and this state shall reimburse such other state for the compensation paid and actual and necessary travel, subsistence and maintenance expenses of the personnel of such emergency management support force while rendering such aid, and for all payments for death, disability or injury of such personnel incurred in the course of rendering such aid, and for all losses of or damage to supplies and equipment of such other state or a political subdivision thereof resulting from the rendering of such aid; provided that the laws of such other state contain provisions substantially similar to this section. (e)  No personnel of emergency management support forces of this state shall be ordered by the Governor to operate in any other state unless the laws of such other state contain provisions substantially similar to this section. SECTION 15. Section 33-15-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 33-15-17.  (a)  Each county and municipality, or counties and the municipalities therein acting jointly, or two (2) or more counties acting jointly, of this state are hereby authorized and directed to establish a local organization for emergency management in accordance with the state emergency management plan and program, if required and authorized so to do by such state emergency management plan.  Each local organization for emergency management shall have a director who shall be appointed by the governing body of the political subdivision, or political subdivisions acting jointly, and who shall have direct responsibility for the organization, administration and operation of such local organization for emergency management, subject to the direction and control of such governing body.  Each local organization for emergency management shall perform emergency management functions within the territorial limits of the political subdivision within which it is organized, and, in addition, shall conduct such functions outside of such territorial limits as may be required pursuant to the provisions of the state emergency management plan.  Each county shall develop an emergency management plan and program that is coordinated and consistent with the State Comprehensive Emergency Management Plan and program.  Counties that are part of an interjurisdictional emergency management agreement entered into pursuant to this section shall cooperatively develop an emergency management plan and program that is coordinated and consistent with the state emergency management plan and program. (b)  In carrying out the provisions of this article each county and municipality, or the two (2) acting jointly, or two (2) or more counties acting jointly, where there is joint organization, in which any disaster as described in Section 33-15-5 occurs, shall have the power to enter into contracts and incur obligations necessary to combat such disaster, protecting the health and safety of persons and property, and providing emergency assistance to the victims of such disaster.  Each county and municipality is authorized to exercise the powers vested under this section in the light of the exigencies of the extreme emergency situation without regard to time-consuming procedures and formalities prescribed by law pertaining to the performance of public work, entering into contracts, the incurring of obligations, the employment of temporary workers, the rental of equipment, the purchase of supplies and materials, the levying of taxes and the appropriation and expenditure of public funds. (c)  Each county and each municipality, or two (2) or more counties acting jointly, shall have the power and authority: (1)  To appropriate and expend funds, make contracts, obtain and distribute equipment, materials, and supplies for emergency management purposes; provide for the health and safety of persons and property, including emergency assistance to the victims of any enemy attack or man-made, technological or natural disasters; and to direct and coordinate the development of emergency management plans and programs in accordance with the policies and plans set by the federal and state emergency management agencies; (2)  To appoint, employ, remove, or provide, with or without compensation, air raid wardens, rescue teams, auxiliary fire and police personnel, and other emergency management workers; (3)  To establish, as necessary, a primary and one or more secondary emergency operating centers to provide continuity of government, and direction and control of emergency operation during an emergency; (4)  To donate public funds, supplies, labor and equipment to assist any governmental entity in a county or municipality in which a disaster as described in Section 33-15-5 occurs; (5)  Subject to the order of the Governor, or the chief executive of the political subdivision, to assign and make available for duty, the employees, property or equipment of the subdivision relating to firefighting, engineering, rescue, health, medical and related services, police, transportation, construction, and similar items or services for emergency management purposes either within or outside of the limits of the subdivision; (6)  Subject to the order of the chief executive of the county or municipality or the Governor to order the evacuation of any area subject to an impending or existing enemy attack or man-made, technological or natural disaster; (7)  Subject to the order of the chief executive of the county or municipality or the Governor, to control or restrict egress, ingress and movement within the disaster area to the degree necessary to facilitate the protection of life and property; (8)  To enter into mutual aid agreements in the manner authorized by Section 33-15-19. (d)  A local emergency as defined in Section 33-15-5 may be proclaimed by the mayor or governing body of a municipality, or the president of the board of supervisors of a county or the governing body of a county.  In the event a local emergency is proclaimed by the mayor of a municipality or the president of the board of supervisors of a county, the governing body of such municipality or the governing body of such county shall review and approve or disapprove the need for continuing the local emergency at its first regular meeting following such proclamation or at a special meeting legally called for such review.  Thereafter, the governing body of such municipality or the governing body of such county shall review the need for continuing the local emergency at least every thirty (30) days until such local emergency is terminated, and shall proclaim the termination of such local emergency at the earliest possible date that conditions warrant.  During a local emergency, the governing body of a political subdivision may promulgate orders and regulations necessary to provide for the protection of life and property, including orders or regulations imposing a curfew within designated boundaries where necessary to preserve the public order and safety.  Such orders and regulations and amendments and rescissions thereof shall be in writing and shall be given widespread notice and publicity.  The authorization granted by this section to impose a curfew shall not be construed as restricting in any manner the existing authority to impose a curfew pursuant to police power for any other lawful purpose. SECTION 16. Section 33-15-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 33-15-19.  (a)  The governing body of a municipality or county of the state is authorized to participate in the Statewide Mutual Aid Compact (SMAC) established by the agency as a mechanism to standardize mutual aid arrangements between jurisdictions within the state.  The agency is authorized to present the SMAC to the Mississippi Band of Choctaw Indians' Tribal Council for its consideration and approval.  SMAC provides guidelines for requesting and receiving mutual aid, liability protection and reimbursement procedures for providing such aid.  The governing body of each political subdivision of the state is strongly encouraged to sign and ratify the SMAC for mutual aid between their jurisdiction and other cities or counties within the state as well as the Mississippi Band of the Choctaw Indians.  A copy of this agreement must be signed by the senior elected official of the jurisdiction and the director and will be maintained on file by the agency. (b)  Political subdivisions of the state, including their fire service agencies, are also authorized to develop and enter into mutual aid agreements with other jurisdictions outside the state for reciprocal emergency aid and assistance in case of emergencies too extensive to be dealt with unassisted.  This shall also include emergencies outside the state in which it is geographically reasonable for a political subdivision of this state, or its fire service, to respond.  Copies of the agreements shall be sent to the agency and shall be consistent with the State Comprehensive Emergency Management Plan and program, and in time of emergency it shall be the duty of each local emergency management organization to render assistance in accordance with the provisions of such mutual aid agreements. (c)  The Governor may enter into compacts with any state or group of states if he finds that joint action with that state or group of states is desirable in meeting common intergovernmental problems of emergency management planning or emergency prevention, mitigation, response and recovery. (1)  Political subdivisions of the state, including their fire service agencies, shall not be liable for the death of or any injury to persons, or damage to property and all other protections provided in Section 33-15-21(a), as a result of mutual aid agreements entered into pursuant to this section. (2)  Employees of a political subdivision of this state shall have the powers, duties, rights, privileges and immunities and receive the compensation incidental to their employment and all other benefits provided by Section 33-15-15. SECTION 17. Section 33-15-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 33-15-21.  (a)  Neither the state nor any political subdivision thereof, nor other agencies, nor, except in cases of willful misconduct, the agents, employees, or representatives of any of them engaged in any emergency management activities, while complying with or attempting to comply with this article or any rule or regulation promulgated pursuant to the provisions of this article, shall be liable for the death of or any injury to persons, or damage to property, as a result of such activity. The provisions of this section shall not affect the right of any person to receive benefits to which he would otherwise be entitled under this article, or under the workmen's compensation law, or under any pension law, nor the right of any such person to receive any benefits or compensation under any act of congress. (b)  Any person owning or controlling real estate or other premises who voluntarily and without compensation grants a license or privilege, or otherwise permits the designation or use of the whole or any part or parts of such real estate or premises for the purpose of sheltering persons or providing assistance to persons during or in recovery from an actual, impending, mock or practice attack or any man-made, technological or natural disaster, together with his successors in interest, if any, shall not be civilly liable for negligently causing the death of, or injury to, any person on or about such real estate or premises by virtue of its use for emergency management purposes, or loss of, or damage to, the property of such person. SECTION 18. Section 33-15-23, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 33-15-23.  For the purpose of paying any expenses of its local emergency management organization, or for paying any expenses of the emergency management program, any board of supervisors of a county or any governing body of a municipality is authorized to expend any available funds from the general fund of such county or municipality. SECTION 19. Section 33-15-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 33-15-25.  (a)  The Governor of the State of Mississippi is authorized to enter into agreements with the federal government for the purpose of matching any federal funds that may be made available for emergency management purposes, which shall include purchasing emergency management equipment and supplies, to the state on a matching basis.  Provided, that no agreement shall obligate the state for an amount greater than the appropriation available for such purpose.  The state's portion of the purchase price of any emergency management equipment may be made available from any appropriation made for such purposes. (b)  Any county board of supervisors or municipal governing body may enter into agreement with the federal government with approval of the State Director of Emergency Management for matching funds which may be made available for emergency management purposes, which shall include purchasing emergency management equipment and supplies, by such county or municipality in conjunction with any federal matching program and funds may be expended from the general fund of such county or municipality or from such other funds as may be available to such county or municipality for emergency management purposes in order to provide the county or municipal portion of funds necessary to carry out such matching agreement. (c)  The agency may withhold from any county board of supervisors, municipality or not-for-profit entity a portion or all of a subgrant whenever the agency determines that the county, municipality or not-for-profit entity owes a refund on any past subgrant project that was not completed as required. SECTION 20. Section 33-15-27, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 33-15-27.  (a)  Whenever the federal government or any agency or officer thereof shall offer to the state, or through the state to any political subdivision thereof, services, equipment, supplies, materials, or funds by way of gift, grant or loan, for purposes of emergency management, the state, acting through the Governor, or such political subdivision, acting with the consent of the Governor and through its governing body, may accept such offer and upon such acceptance the Governor of the state or governing body of such political subdivision, may authorize any officer of the state or of the political subdivision, as the case may be, to receive such services, equipment, supplies, materials, or funds on behalf of the state or such political subdivision, and subject to the terms of the offer and the rules and regulations, if any, of the agency making the offer. (b)  Whenever any person, firm or corporation shall offer to the state or to any political subdivision thereof, services, equipment, supplies, materials, or funds by way of gift, grant or loan, for purposes of emergency management, the state, acting through the Governor, or such political subdivision, acting through its governing body may accept such offer and upon such acceptance the Governor of the state or governing body of such political subdivision may authorize any officer of the state or of the political subdivision, as the case may be, to receive such services, equipment, supplies, materials, or funds on behalf of the state or such political subdivision, and subject to the terms of the offer. SECTION 21. Section 33-15-29, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 33-15-29.  (a)  In carrying out the provisions of this article, the Governor and the executive officers or governing bodies of the political subdivisions of the state are directed to utilize the services, equipment, supplies and facilities of existing departments, offices, and agencies of the state and of the political subdivisions thereof to the maximum extent practicable, and the officers and personnel of all such departments, offices, and agencies are directed to cooperate with and extend such services and facilities to the Governor and to the emergency management organizations of the state or such subdivisions upon request. (b)  State agencies in carrying out their assigned disaster or emergency assignments shall be reimbursed their expenses for emergency or disaster-related duties which may include the payment of overtime and the employment of temporary personnel by such agencies in the same manner as authorized in Sections 33-15-301 et seq., 43-41-17 and 43-41-319, and as provided by Section 43-41-701. SECTION 22. Section 33-15-31, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 33-15-31.  (a)  The governing bodies of the political subdivisions of the state and other agencies designated or appointed by the Governor are authorized and empowered to make, amend, and rescind such orders, rules, and regulations as may be necessary for emergency management purposes and to supplement the carrying out of the provisions of this article, but not inconsistent with any orders, rules and regulations promulgated by the Governor or by any state agency exercising a power delegated to it by him. (b)  All orders, rules, and regulations promulgated by the Governor, the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency or by any political subdivision or other agency authorized by this article to make orders, rules and regulations, shall have the full force and effect of law, when, in the event of issuance by the Governor, or any state agency, a copy thereof is filed in the office of the Secretary of State, or, if promulgated by a political subdivision of the state or agency thereof, when filed in the office of the clerk of the political subdivision or agency promulgating the same.  All existing laws, ordinances, rules and regulations inconsistent with the provisions of this article, or of any order, rule, or regulation issued under the authority of this article, shall be suspended during the period of time and to the extent that such conflict, disaster or emergency exists. (c)  In order to attain uniformity so far as practicable throughout the country in measures taken to aid emergency management, all action taken under this article and all orders, rules and regulations made pursuant thereto, shall be taken or made with due consideration to the orders, rules, regulations, actions, recommendations, and requests of federal authorities relevant thereto and, to the extent permitted by law, shall be consistent with such orders, rules, regulations, actions, recommendations and requests. SECTION 23. Section 33-15-33, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 33-15-33.  No individual employed by or for an organization for emergency management established under the authority of this article shall, while acting under authority of his or her position or representing himself or herself in his or her official capacity, participate in any form of political activity, and no such organization shall be employed directly or indirectly for political purposes. SECTION 24. Section 33-15-37, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 33-15-37.  It shall be the duty of every organization for emergency management established pursuant to this article and of the officers thereof to execute and enforce such orders, rules and regulations as may be made by the Governor under authority of this article. Each such organization shall have available for inspection at its office all orders, rules and regulations made by the Governor, or under his authority. SECTION 25. Section 33-15-39, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 33-15-39.  Any county or municipality, through its governing board, and with the approval of the sheriff in a county, or the chief of police in a municipality, may confer upon members of emergency management auxiliary police units, the powers of peace officers, subject to such restrictions as shall be imposed. SECTION 26. Section 33-15-41, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 33-15-41. Any emergency management auxiliary policeman who has had conferred upon him the power of a peace officer, as provided in Section 33-15-39 and when in full and distinctive uniform or displaying a badge or other insignia of authority, may arrest without a warrant any person violating or attempting to violate in such officer's presence any order, rule, or regulation made pursuant to this article.  This authority shall be limited to those rules and regulations which affect the public generally. SECTION 27. Section 33-15-43, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 33-15-43.  Any person violating any provision of this article or any rule, order, or regulation made pursuant to this article shall, upon conviction thereof, be punishable by a fine not exceeding Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or imprisonment for not exceeding six (6) months or both. SECTION 28. Section 33-15-45, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 33-15-45.  All local emergency management councils heretofore created under the provisions of former Sections 8610-8620, Mississippi Code of 1942, are hereby continued, subject to the provisions of this article. SECTION 29. Section 33-15-47, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 33-15-47.  This article shall be construed liberally in order to effectuate its purposes. SECTION 30. Section 33-15-49, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 33-15-49.  In the event an impending enemy attack, an enemy attack, or a man-made, technological or natural disaster occurs within the state or within any portion of it and a proclamation is issued by the governing authorities of the county, the governing authorities of the municipality, the Office of the Governor of the state or the President of the United States declaring such affected areas to be disaster areas, the governing authorities of any county or municipality adversely affected by such disaster may: (a)  Use county or municipally owned equipment and such public employees as necessary to venture onto private property to aid in removing debris and to prevent further damage to such property at the request of the property owners; (b)  Use county or municipally owned equipment and such public employees as necessary to venture onto private property to remove debris and to perform any other necessary and needed services to prevent the spread of disease or any other health hazard to the community at large. If the governing authorities of such adversely affected counties or municipalities are unable to perform such necessary and needed functions with their own equipment and personnel, they may request aid from other counties and municipalities not adversely affected by such impending enemy attack, enemy attack, or man-made, technological or natural disaster, and capable and willing to furnish needed services. Provided, however, if the Governor determines that the governing authorities of such adversely affected counties or municipalities still lack sufficient equipment and personnel under such circumstances to perform such functions, any state agency or instrumentality, when directed by the Governor, is authorized to enter upon publicly or privately owned land or water and to use state-owned equipment and state employees as necessary to clear or remove debris and wreckage.  Whenever the governor provides for clearance of debris or wreckage pursuant hereto, employees of the designated state agencies or instrumentalities are authorized to enter upon private or public land or water and perform any tasks necessary to the removal or clearance operation.  Except in cases of willful misconduct, gross negligence or bad faith, any state employee or agent complying with and performing duties pursuant hereto shall not be liable for death or injury to persons or damage to property. SECTION 31. Section 33-15-51, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 33-15-51.  The Grand Gulf Disaster Assistance Trust Fund is hereby created as a special fund in the State Treasury to be administered by the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency. Monies paid into the fund shall be derived from Sections 27-35-309(3)(b)(i) and (ii) and 27-35-309(3)(d).  All monies deposited therein shall be available for expenditure, transfer and allocation by the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency for state and local preparedness activities directly related to the Grand Gulf Nuclear Generating Plant, with at least fifty percent (50%) of the monies in the fund earmarked for use in conducting such activities in the geographic area falling within a thirty-mile radius of the plant. SECTION 32. Section 33-15-53, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 33-15-53.  The head of each state department, agency or commission shall select from within such agency a person to be designated as the emergency coordination officer for the agency and an alternate.  The emergency coordination officer is responsible for coordinating with the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency on emergency preparedness issues, preparing and maintaining emergency preparedness and postdisaster response and recovery plans for such agency, maintaining rosters of personnel to assist in disaster operations and coordinating appropriate training for agency personnel.  These individuals shall be responsible for ensuring that each state facility, such as a prison, office building or university, has a disaster preparedness plan that is approved by the applicable local emergency management agency or the division.  The head of each agency shall notify the Governor and the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency in writing of the person initially designated as the emergency coordination officer for such agency and his alternate and of any changes in persons so designated thereafter. SECTION 33. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026, and shall stand repealed on June 30, 2026.